Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1912
Undesirable radiation, defined.

Undesirable radiation means radiation in such quantity and under such circumstances as determined from time to time by rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the department.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 650.